Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-602
Registered voters; qualifications.

All registered voters residing within the corporate limits of any city of the second class or village on or before election day shall be entitled to vote at all city and village elections.

Laws 1879, § 61, p. 208;

R.S.1913, § 5144;

C.S.1922, § 4319;

C.S.1929, § 17-510;

R.S.1943, § 17-602;

Laws 1963, c. 74, § 1, p. 277;

Laws 1973, LB 559, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 497;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 201.